dev/mt_wiktionary/noun.all.dix
    <pardef n="vjal__n_m">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="għas/fur__n_m">
      <e><p><l>fur</l><r>fur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>afar</l><r>fur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/arbija__n_f">
      <e><p><l>arbija</l><r>arbija<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rabi</l><r>arbija<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="extrej__n_m">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="l/ibsa__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ibsa</l><r>ibsa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ibies</l><r>ibsa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sħubij/a__n_f">
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iet</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="blokk/a__n_f">
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ok</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pjanet/a__n_m">
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="għas/fura__n_f">
      <e><p><l>fura</l><r>fura<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>afar</l><r>fura<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/eżżula__n_f">
      <e><p><l>eżżula</l><r>eżżula<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>żieżel</l><r>eżżula<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="att/riċi__n_f">
      <e><p><l>riċi</l><r>riċi<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uri</l><r>riċi<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ż/iemel__n_m">
      <e><p><l>iemel</l><r>iemel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wiemel</l><r>iemel<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="interazzjoni/_fundamentali__n_f">
      <e><p><l>_fundamentali</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jiet</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="tagħbija"><i>tagħbij</i><par n="sħubij/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="attriċi"><i>att</i><par n="att/riċi__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pjaċir"><i>pjaċir</i><par n="vjal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="sħubija"><i>sħubij</i><par n="sħubij/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="libsa"><i>l</i><par n="l/ibsa__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pajjiż"><i>pajjiż</i><par n="vjal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="għasfura"><i>għas</i><par n="għas/fura__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="proġett"><i>proġett</i><par n="vjal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="artal"><i>artal</i><par n="vjal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="mistoqsija"><i>mistoqsij</i><par n="sħubij/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="extrej"><i>extrej</i><par n="extrej__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="annimal"><i>annimal</i><par n="vjal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="beżżula"><i>b</i><par n="b/eżżula__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="żiemel"><i>ż</i><par n="ż/iemel__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="vjal"><i>vjal</i><par n="vjal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tarbija"><i>t</i><par n="t/arbija__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="deżert"><i>deżert</i><par n="vjal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="għasfur"><i>għas</i><par n="għas/fur__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="blokka"><i>blokk</i><par n="blokk/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="dipartiment"><i>dipartiment</i><par n="vjal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="rwol"><i>rwol</i><par n="vjal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ajruplan"><i>ajruplan</i><par n="vjal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="attur"><i>attur</i><par n="vjal__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="interazzjoni_fundamentali"><i>interazzjoni</i><par n="interazzjoni/_fundamentali__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pjaneta"><i>pjanet</i><par n="pjanet/a__n_m"/></e>
